South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4686.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-1-40 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-1-40. The Department of Motor Vehicles may not issue a motor vehicle driver's license to or renew the driver's license of a person: (1) who is under seventeen years of age, except that the department may issue a license to a sixteen-year-old who is licensed to drive pursuant to Section 56-1-175 after one year from the date of the issuance of the conditional license, if the driver has not been convicted of a traffic offense or has not been involved in an accident in which he was at fault during that period. However, the department may issue a beginner's permit as provided in Section 56-1-50 to a person who is at least fifteen years of age and meets the requirements of that section. The department also may issue a special restricted driver's license to a person who is at least sixteen years of age and less than seventeen years of age as provided in Section 56-1-180 and meets the requirements of that section; (2) whose driver's license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle currently is suspended or revoked in this State or another jurisdiction, except as otherwise provided for in this title; (3) who is an habitual user of alcohol or any other drug to a degree which prevents him from safely operating a motor vehicle; (4) who has a mental or physical condition which prevents him from safely operating a motor vehicle; (5) who is required by this article to take an examination, unless the person successfully has passed the examination; (6) who is required under the laws of this State to provide proof of financial responsibility and has not provided the proof; (7) who is not a resident of South Carolina. For purposes of determining eligibility to obtain or renew a South Carolina driver's license, the term "resident of South Carolina" shall expressly include all persons authorized by the United States Department of Justice, the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service, or the United States Department of State to live, work, or study in the United States on a temporary or permanent basis who present documents indicating their intent to live, work, or study in South Carolina. These persons and their dependents are eligible to obtain a motor vehicle driver's license or have one renewed pursuant to this provision. A driver's license issued pursuant to this item to a person who is not a lawful permanent resident of the United States shall expire on the later of: (1) the expiration date of the driver's license applicant's authorized period of stay in the United States; or (2) the expiration date of the driver's license applicant's employment authorization document. However, a driver's license issued pursuant to this item is valid for at least one year but not more than eight years from the date of its issue. Under this provision, a driver's license valid for not more than four years must be issued upon payment of a fee of twelve dollars and fifty cents. A driver's license that is valid for more than four years must be issued upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars. In addition, a person pending adjustment of status who presents appropriate documentation to the Department of Motor Vehicles shall be granted a one-year extension of his driver's license which is renewable annually; (8) who must not be issued a license as otherwise provided by the laws of this State; (9) who can not demonstrate proficiency in reading and understanding the English language. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----